Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 294.060 is amended to read:
294.060. (1) The moneys received by each county under ORS 293.560  shall be divided 75 percent
to the road fund and 25 percent to the school fund  of the county and, subject to subsection (2) of
this section, the moneys shall be expended as other moneys in those funds are expended.
(2) The moneys apportioned to the county road fund may be applied in  payment of any out-
standing road bonds or may be placed in any county  road bond sinking fund for the purpose of being
so applied.
(3) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county east of  the summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 9,000 and more
than 6,500, according to the 1990 federal decennial census,  moneys from the road fund in excess of
$2 million may be transferred to the school fund  when the amount of [ money] moneys credited to
the road fund under subsection (1) of this section exceeds the amount needed  for county roads, as
determined by  the board of county commissioners. Any amount received by a school district from
the school fund of the county that  is in excess of the 25 percent required under subsection (1) of this
section may not  be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments from the
State School Fund.
(4) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county east of the  summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 58,000 and more
than 55,000, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, if  the moneys credited to the road fund
under subsection (1) of this section exceed the amount needed for county  roads, as determined by
the county governing body, the  portion of such moneys in excess of an amount specified by the
county governing body may be transferred  to the school fund of the county or may be transferred
directly to the school districts of the county in accordance with procedures established  by the
county governing body. The county governing body may distribute moneys  under this subsection
among the  several school districts without regard to the percentage of the resident average daily
membership in each school district. Moneys transferred under this subsection may  be transferred
upon the condition that any  school district receiving a share of such moneys must use the moneys
only for a purpose described in ORS 328.205 (1)(a)  or (c). Any amount received by a school district
from the county under this subsection that is in excess of the 25 percent  required under subsection
(1) of  this section may not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments
from the State School Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 2174 (HB 2174-A) Page 1
(5) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county east of the summit of  the Cascade Mountains with a population of less than 6,500, according
to the 1990 federal decennial census,  moneys received by the county under ORS 293.560 may be di-
vided between the road fund and the school fund of the county as specified  under an agreement
between the county governing body and the education  service district board of the county that
provides for a different apportionment of those moneys. Any amount received by a school  district
from the school fund of the county that is in excess of the 25 percent  required under subsection (1)
of this section may  not be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments
from the State School Fund.
(6) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this  section, in any
county west of the summit of the Cascade Mountains with a population of less  than 19,500 and more
than 6,500, according to the 1990 federal decennial census,  moneys from the road fund in excess of
$1 million may be transferred to the school fund  when the amount of [ money] moneys credited to
the road fund under subsection  (1) of this section exceeds the amount needed for county roads, as
determined by the board of county commissioners. Any amount received by a school district  from
the school fund of the county that  is in excess of the 25 percent required under subsection (1) of this
section may not  be considered as a receipt that would reduce the district’s apportionments from the
State School Fund.
(7) As used in subsections (3) to (6) of this section, “summit of  the Cascade Mountains” has the
meaning [ for that term provided ] given that term  in ORS 477.001.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding the division of receipts specified in subsection (1) of this section,
the moneys that would otherwise be credited to the  road fund of a county under subsection
(1) of this section may instead be credited in accordance with this subsection.
(b) Upon request of the governing body of a county, the  Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services shall credit  the moneys described in paragraph (a) of this subsection to one
of the following public bodies, provided the service territory of the public body  includes the
entire county:
(A) An intergovernmental entity created by agreement under ORS 190.003 to 190.130;
(B) A county road district formed under ORS 371.055 to 371.110; or
(C) A service district for roads established under ORS chapter 451.
(c) Moneys credited to  a public body under this subsection shall be used in the same
manner and subject to  the same restrictions as would have applied to the moneys in the
hands of  the county that made the request under paragraph (b) of this subsection, including,
but not limited to, the requirements of ORS chapter 368 related to the use of  moneys in a
county road fund.
(d) The governing body of the county may request that the department discontinue
crediting the moneys  to the public body at any time. Not later than 30 days after receiving
a request under this paragraph, the department shall resume crediting  the moneys in ac-
cordance with subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2174 (HB 2174-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 18, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2174 (HB 2174-A) Page 3